District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-129.09

Use of funds.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-171, § 19
as added Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-226, § 102, 51 DCR 10539
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 115, 52 DCR 10637
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 101(b), 62 DCR 1884

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-129.08.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-91, in the section heading, validated a previously made technical correction.